District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.29

Incorporators.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 276, Pub. L. 87-569, § 29
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 24, 33 DCR 7836
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.29.
1981 Ed., § 29-529.
1973 Ed., § 29-1029.